Hawaii statutes.
§342D-7 Variances. (a) Every
application for a variance shall be made on forms furnished by the department
and shall be accompanied by a complete and detailed description of present
conditions, how present conditions do not conform to standards, and such other
information as the department may by rule prescribe.

(b) Each application for a variance shall be
reviewed in light of the descriptions, statements, plans, histories, and other
supporting information submitted with the application, such additional
information as may be submitted upon the request of the department, and the
effect or probable effect upon the water quality standards established pursuant
to this chapter.

(c) Whenever an application is approved, the
department shall issue a variance authorizing the discharge of water pollutant
in excess of applicable standards. No variance shall be granted by the
department unless the application and the supporting information clearly show
that:

(1) The continuation of the function or operation involved
in the discharge of waste occurring or proposed to occur by the granting of the
variance is in the public interest as defined in section 342D-6;

(2) The discharge occurring or proposed to occur does
not substantially endanger human health or safety; and

(3) Compliance with the rules or standards from which
variance is sought would produce serious hardship without equal or greater
benefits to the public.

(d) Any variance or renewal thereof shall be
granted within the requirements of this section and for time periods and under
conditions consistent with the reasons therefor, and within the following
limitations:

(1) If the variance is granted on the ground that
there is no practicable means known or available for the adequate prevention,
control, or abatement of the water pollution involved, it shall be only until
the necessary means for prevention, control, or abatement become practicable
and subject to the taking of any substitute or alternate measures that the
department may prescribe. No renewal of a variance granted under this
subsection shall be allowed without a thorough review of known and available
means of preventing, controlling, or abating the water pollution involved.

(2) The director may issue a variance for a period
not exceeding five years.

(3) Every variance granted under this section shall
include conditions requiring the grantee to perform discharge or effluent
sampling and report the results of such sampling to the department.

(e) Any variance granted pursuant to this
section may be renewed from time to time on terms and conditions and for
periods not exceeding five years which would be appropriate on initial granting
of a variance; provided that the applicant for renewal has met all of the
conditions specified in the immediately preceding variance; and provided
further that the renewal, and the variance issued in pursuance thereof, shall
provide for discharge not greater than that attained pursuant to the terms of
the immediately preceding variance at its expiration. No renewal shall be
granted except on application therefor. Any such application shall be made at
least one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration of the variance. The
director shall act on an application for renewal within one hundred eighty days
of the receipt of such application.

(f) The director may afford a hearing in
accordance with chapter 91 in relation to an application for the issuance,
renewal, or modification of a variance.

(g) No variance granted pursuant to this
chapter shall be construed to prevent or limit the application of any emergency
provisions and procedures provided by law.

(h) Notwithstanding any provision in this
section, no variance shall be granted or renewed pursuant to this chapter with
respect to any discharge of water pollutants or wastes that is in violation of
the requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and the amendments
thereto.

(i) Any application for a variance, submitted
pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to the public participation
requirements listed below:

(1) Public notices of every completed application for
a variance shall be circulated in a manner designed to inform interested and
potentially interested persons of the proposed discharge or other proposed
activity. Procedures for the circulation of public notices shall include at
least the following:

(A) Notice shall be given within the
geographical areas of the proposed discharge or other proposed activity;

(B) Notice shall be mailed to any person or
group upon request; and

(C) The director shall add the name of any
person or group upon request to a mailing list to receive copies of notices for
all variance applications within the State or within a certain geographical
area;

(2) The director shall provide a period of not less
than thirty days following the date of the public notice during which time
interested persons may submit their written reviews with respect to the
variance application and the tentative determinations of the department, if
any. The period for comment may be extended at the discretion of the director;

(3) The contents of public notice of applications for
variances shall include at least the following:

(A) Name, address, and phone number of agency
issuing the public notice;

(B) Name and address of each applicant;

(C) Brief description of each applicant's
activities or operations which result in the discharge or other activity
described in the variance application (e.g., rock crushing plant, municipal
waste treatment plant, raw sugar factory, or pineapple cannery);

(D) A short description of the location of
each discharge indicating whether the discharge is new or existing;

(E) A brief description of the procedures for
the formulation of final determinations, including the thirty-day comment
period required by paragraph (2) and any other means by which interested
persons may influence or comment upon those determinations; and

(F) Address and phone number of state agency
premises at which interested persons may obtain further information and inspect
a copy of the variance applications and supporting and related documents; and

(4) The director may hold a public hearing if, after
reviewing the comments submitted under paragraph (2), the director determines
that a public hearing is warranted. Any hearing brought pursuant to this
subsection shall be held in the geographical area of the proposed discharge or
other proposed activity, or other appropriate area, at the discretion of the
director. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 2, §88]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next